src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/V-muqdzhw_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Verb - muʼdžõ: # Verb 30 'eng /est sasida/fin' - full paradigm
     muʼdžõ+V+IV+Inf: [muʼdžõ, mudžõ]
     muʼdžõ+V+IV+Ger+Ine: [muʼdžõs, mudžõs]
     muʼdžõ+V+IV+Sup: [muʼdžõm, mudžõm]
     muʼdžõ+V+IV+Sup+Ine: [muʼdžõmõs, mudžõmõs]
     muʼdžõ+V+IV+Sup+Ela: [muʼdžõmõst, mudžõmõst]
     muʼdžõ+V+IV+Sup+Tra: [muʼdžõmõks, mudžõmõks]
     muʼdžõ+V+IV+Sup+Abe: [muʼdžõmõt, mudžõmõt]
     muʼdžõ+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg3: mudžūb
     muʼdžõ+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Pl2: [muʼdžõt, mudžõt]
     muʼdžõ+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Pl3: [muʼdžõbõd, mudžõbõd]
     muʼdžõ+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg3: mudžīz
     muʼdžõ+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Pl2: [mudžīzt, mudžīztõ]
     muʼdžõ+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [mudžīzt, mudžīztõ]
     muʼdžõ+V+IV+Ind+ConNeg+Sg: [muʼdž, mudž]
     muʼdžõ+V+IV+Cond+Sg3: [muʼdžõks, mudžõks]
     muʼdžõ+V+IV+Imprt+Sg2: [muʼdž, mudž]
     muʼdžõ+V+IV+Imprt+ConNeg: [muʼdž, mudž]
     muʼdžõ+V+IV+Imprt+Pl2: [muʼdžõgid, mudžõgid]
     muʼdžõ+V+IV+Jus+Sg: [muʼdžõg, mudžõg]
     muʼdžõ+V+IV+Quo+Sg: [muʼdžiji, mudžiji]
     muʼdžõ+V+IV+ActPrfPrc+Sg: [muʼdžõn, mudžõn]
     muʼdžõ+V+IV+PssPrfPrc: [muʼdždõd, mudždõd]
